Wisconsin, session 2025, SB821.
do enact as follows:SB821,14Section 1. 60.23 (32) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB821,2,4160.23 (32) (b) 1. In this paragraph, “town” means the town of Brookfield in 2Waukesha County, the town of Somers in Kenosha County, the town of Freedom in 3Outagamie County, the town of Cable in Bayfield County, or the town of Gibraltar 4in Door County, or the town of Three Lakes in Oneida County.SB821,2,55